dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="भन/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ना</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिनुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउदो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ना</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदिने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थिस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैछस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैछौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छेस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेऊ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थ्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ठान्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुभयो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भात__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ला__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बित/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ठिहिर्या__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ला"><i>ला</i><par n="ला__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भात"><i>भात</i><par n="भात__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्"><i>भन</i><par n="भन/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="भात__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ठिहिर्या"><i>ठिहिर्या</i><par n="ठिहिर्या__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हान्"><i>हान</i><par n="बित/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्"><i>बित</i><par n="बित/्__vblex"/></e>
